Massachusetts, session 194th, H4339.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
2 section 17Z, the following section:- 
3  Section 17AA. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
4 meanings: 
5  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
6 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
7 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
8 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
9 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 
10  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
11 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 
12 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
13 transcriptome sequencing. 

2 of 16 14  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
15 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
16 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 
17 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
18 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 
19  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
20 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
21 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
22 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 
23 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
24 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  
25  (b) The commission shall provide to any active or retired employee of the commonwealth 
26 who is insured under the group insurance commission coverage for biomarker testing as defined 
27 in this section, pursuant to criteria established under subsection (c). 
28  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
29 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
30 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 
31  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test; 
32  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 
33  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 

3 of 16 34  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
35 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
36 Determinations; or 
37  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 
38  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
39 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
40  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
41 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 
42 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
43 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 
44 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
45 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 
46 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
47 deemed granted. 
48  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
49 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
50 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website. 
51  SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
52 section 10Z, the following section:- 
53  Section 10AA. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
54 meanings: 

4 of 16 55  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
56 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
57 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
58 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
59 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 
60  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
61 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 
62 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
63 transcriptome sequencing. 
64  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
65 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
66 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 
67 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
68 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 
69  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
70 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
71 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
72 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 
73 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
74 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  
75  (b) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance 
76 organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract 

5 of 16 77 to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage 
78 for biomarker testing as defined in this section, pursuant to criteria established under subsection 
79 (c). 
80  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
81 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
82 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 
83  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test 
84  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 
85  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 
86  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
87 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
88 Determinations; or 
89  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 
90  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
91 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
92  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
93 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 
94 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
95 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 
96 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
97 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 

6 of 16 98 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
99 deemed granted. 
100  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
101 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
102 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website. 
103  SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting before 
104 section 47CCC, the following section:- 
105  Section 47AAA. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
106 meanings: 
107  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
108 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
109 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
110 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
111 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 
112  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
113 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 
114 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
115 transcriptome sequencing. 
116  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
117 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
118 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 

7 of 16 119 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
120 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 
121  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
122 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
123 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
124 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 
125 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
126 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  
127  (b) Any blanket or general policy of insurance described in subdivision (A), (C), or (D) 
128 of section one hundred and ten which is issued or subsequently renewed by agreement between 
129 the insurer and the policyholder, within or without the commonwealth, during the period within 
130 which this premium is effective, or any policy of accident or sickness insurance as described in 
131 section one hundred and eight which provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance 
132 and which is delivered or issued for delivery or subsequently renewed by agreement between the 
133 insurer and the policyholder in the commonwealth, during the period within which this provision 
134 is effective, or any employers' health and welfare fund which provides hospital expense and 
135 surgical expense benefits and which is issued or renewed to any person or group of persons in 
136 the commonwealth, during the period within which this provision is effective, shall provide 
137 benefits for residents of the commonwealth and all group members having a principal place of 
138 employment in the commonwealth for biomarker testing as defined in this section, pursuant to 
139 criteria established under subsection (c). 

8 of 16 140  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
141 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
142 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 
143  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test 
144  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 
145  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 
146  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
147 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
148 Determinations; or 
149  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 
150  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
151 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
152  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
153 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 
154 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
155 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 
156 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
157 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 
158 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
159 deemed granted. 

9 of 16 160  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
161 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
162 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website. 
163  SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
164 section 8DDD, the following section:- 
165  Section 8EEE. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
166 meanings: 
167  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
168 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
169 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
170 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
171 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 
172  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
173 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 
174 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
175 transcriptome, sequencing. 
176  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
177 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
178 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 
179 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
180 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 

10 of 16 181  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
182 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
183 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
184 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 
185 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
186 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  
187  (b) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group 
188 hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide 
189 coverage for biomarker testing as defined in this section, pursuant to criteria established under 
190 subsection (c). 
191  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
192 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
193 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 
194  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test  
195  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 
196  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 
197  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
198 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
199 Determinations; or 
200  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 

11 of 16 201  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
202 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
203  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
204 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 
205 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
206 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 
207 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
208 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 
209 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
210 deemed granted. 
211  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
212 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
213 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website. 
214  SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
215 section 4DDD, the following section:- 
216  Section 4EEE. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
217 meanings: 
218  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
219 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
220 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
221 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
222 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 

12 of 16 223  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
224 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 
225 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
226 transcriptome sequencing. 
227  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
228 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
229 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 
230 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
231 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 
232  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
233 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
234 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
235 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 
236 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
237 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  
238  (b) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement 
239 delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for biomarker 
240 testing as defined in this section, pursuant to criteria established under subsection (c). 
241  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
242 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
243 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 
244  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test 

13 of 16 245  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 
246  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 
247  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
248 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
249 Determinations; or 
250  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 
251  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
252 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
253  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
254 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 
255 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
256 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 
257 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
258 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 
259 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
260 deemed granted. 
261  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
262 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
263 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website. 
264  SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
265 section 4VV, as so appearing, the following section:- 

14 of 16 266  Section 4WW. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
267 meanings: 
268  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
269 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
270 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
271 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
272 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 
273  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
274 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 
275 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
276 transcriptome sequencing. 
277  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
278 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
279 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 
280 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
281 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 
282  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
283 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
284 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
285 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 
286 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
287 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  

15 of 16 288  (b)  Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed within 
289 or without the commonwealth shall provide coverage for biomarker testing as defined in this 
290 section, pursuant to criteria established under subsection (c). 
291  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
292 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
293 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 
294  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test 
295  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 
296  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 
297  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
298 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
299 Determinations; or 
300  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 
301  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
302 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
303  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
304 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 
305 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
306 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 
307 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
308 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 

16 of 16 309 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
310 deemed granted. 
311  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
312 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
313 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website.